District of Columbia statutes.
28-2101

Form of assignment.

In a voluntary assignment for the benefit of creditors, the debtor shall annex to the assignment (1) an inventory, under oath or affirmation, of his estate, real and personal, according to the best of his knowledge, (2) a list of his creditors, their respective residences and places of business, if known, and (3) the amounts of their respective demands.

History

Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 667, Pub. L. 88-509, § 1

Cross References

Exemptions, see § 15-501 et seq.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 28-2101.
1973 Ed., § 28-2101.